Arkansas, session 2025, HB1962.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 7, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-18-724. Ultra-processed food — Prohibition — Definition.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Childhood obesity, morbidity, and wellness are matters of
statewide concern;
(2) Ultra-processed, industrially manufactured, nutrient-
depleted food with synthetic additives is undernourishing to students at
schools and contributes to childhood obesity; and
(3) A meal or snack offered to students at schools in this state
should be nutritious and made primarily of nutrient-dense plant or animal
products.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "School" means:
*TNL374*
04/01/2025 2:23:39 PM TNL374

HB1962
(A) A public school district;
(B) An open-enrollment public charter school; or
(C) A private school; and
(2) "Ultra-processed food" means a food or beverage that
contains one (1) or more of the following ingredients:
(A) Potassium bromate;
(B) Propylparaben;
(C) Titanium dioxide;
(D) Yellow dye 5;
(E) Yellow dye 6;
(F) Blue dye 1;
(G) Blue dye 2;
(H) Green dye 3;
(I) Red dye 3; or
(J) Red dye 40.
(c) A school shall not serve or sell on the school campus during the
normal school day ultra-processed food that is produced after January 1,
2028.
(d) This section does not prevent a parent, legal guardian, or person
standing in loco parentis to a student from providing ultra-processed food to
his or her child during the normal school day.
(e) The Department of Education may promulgate rules to implement this
section.













04/01/2025 2:23:39 PM TNL374